Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Procedure for Payments of State Aid.

Cross references. —

For provision concerning the withholding of funds, see AS

14.07.070

.

Collateral references. —

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 428 et seq.

Determination of school attendance, enrollment, or pupil population for purpose of apportionment of funds. 80 ALR2d 953.

Sec. 14.17.600.
Student count periods.

Within two weeks after the end of the 20-school-day period ending the fourth Friday in October, each district shall transmit a report to the department that, under regulations adopted by the department, reports its ADM for that count period and other student count information that will aid the department in making a determination of its state aid under the public school funding program. For centralized correspondence study, the October report shall be based on the period from July 1 through the fourth Friday in October. The department may make necessary corrections in the report submitted and shall notify the district of changes made. The commissioner shall notify the governor of additional appropriations the commissioner estimates to be necessary to fully finance the public school funding program for the current fiscal year.

Upon written request and for good cause shown, the commissioner may permit a district to use a 20-school-day count period other than the period set out in (a) of this section. However, a count period approved under this subsection must be 20 consecutive school days unless one or more alternate count periods are necessary to permit a district to implement flexible scheduling that meets the district’s needs and goals without jeopardizing the state aid for which the district would ordinarily be eligible under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 114 SLA 2003; am § 15 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Sec. 14.17.610.
Distribution of state aid.

The department shall determine the state aid for each school district in a fiscal year on the basis of the district’s student count data reported under AS

14.17.600

. On or before the 15th day of each of the first nine months of each fiscal year, one-twelfth of each district’s state aid shall be distributed on the basis of the data reported for the preceding fiscal year. On or before the 15th day of each of the last three months of each fiscal year, one-third of the balance of each district’s state aid shall be distributed, after the balance has been recomputed on the basis of student count and other data reported for the current fiscal year.

Distribution of state aid under (a) of this section shall be made as required under AS

14.17.410

. If a district receives more state aid than it is entitled to receive under this chapter, the district shall immediately remit the amount of overpayment to the commissioner, to be returned to the public education fund. The department may make adjustments to a district’s state aid to correct underpayments made in previous fiscal years.

Upon an adequate showing of a cash flow shortfall of a district, and in the discretion of the commissioner, the department may make advance payments to a district. The total of advance payments may not exceed the amount of state aid for which the district is eligible for the fiscal year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 4 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.